Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2653.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 40 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 46BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE PROVIDER ACCESSSec.4601. Scope of chapter.4602. Legislative findings and intent.4603. Definitions.4604. Behavioral health care provider access to insurer networks.4605. Preclusion permitted.4606. Parity and nondiscrimination.4607. Claim handling.123456789101112131415161718 4608. Scope of practice.4609. Regulations.4610. Violations.4611. Administrative procedures.§ 4601. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to behavioral health care coverage provided under a health insurance policy.§ 4602. Legislative findings and intent.(a) Legislative findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Timely and effective behavioral health care services are critical for the mental and behavioral health of Pennsylvanians.(2) The selection of a behavioral health care provider is a personal choice that can be based upon many factors, including the provider's background, experience with a particular condition or treatment methods.(3) Individuals should have access to a behavioral health care provider who understands their particular needs.(4) Cost concerns or network restrictions should not prevent an individual from finding and seeking treatment with a behavioral health care provider that is right for the individual.(b) Intent.--The intent of this chapter is to maximize timely and effective access to behavioral health care services for residents of this Commonwealth.§ 4603. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:20260HB2653PN3662 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Administrative policy." A written document or collection of documents reflecting the terms of the contractual or operating relationship between an insurer and a health care provider."Behavioral health care provider." A health care provider that is licensed, certified or otherwise permitted by law or regulation to provide behavioral health care services under the laws of this Commonwealth, including an individual governed by the act of July 9, 1987 (P.L.220, No.39), known as the Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists and Professional Counselors Act."Behavioral health care service." A health care service intended to address behavioral health, including services for mental health and for substance use disorders."Commissioner." The Insurance Commissioner of the Commonwealth."Covered behavioral health care service." A behavioral health care service covered by a covered person's health insurance policy."Covered person." A policyholder, subscriber or other individual who is entitled to receive health care services under a health insurance policy."Health care provider." A person that is licensed, certified or otherwise permitted by law or regulation to provide health care services under the laws of this Commonwealth."Health care service." A treatment, procedure, medical supply or other service, prescribed or otherwise provided or proposed to be provided by a health care provider to a covered person."Health insurance policy." As defined in section 9103 (relating to definitions).20260HB2653PN3662 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Insurer." As defined in section 9103."Participating network provider." A health care provider that has entered into a contractual or operating relationship with an insurer to participate in one or more designated networks of the insurer to provide health care services to covered persons under the terms of the administrative policy of the insurer."Service area." The geographic area in which an insurer may offer a health insurance policy."Telemedicine." As defined in section 4802 (relating to definitions).§ 4604. Behavioral health care provider access to insurer networks.(a) Willing provider.--An insurer may not refuse to contract with a behavioral health care provider that is willing to enter into a contract for participation in a network for a health insurance policy if the behavioral health care provider satisfies all of the following:(1) Is in good standing with the regulatory authority under which the behavioral health care provider is permitted to practice in this Commonwealth.(2) Provides behavioral health care services from an office in this Commonwealth.(3) Provides covered behavioral health care services offered by the insurer for purchase in the service area.(4) Is willing to abide by the standard terms and conditions of the insurer's standard participating network provider contract.(b) Reimbursement rate requirement.--A contract under subsection (a) shall be offered to a behavioral health care 20260HB2653PN3662 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provider at a reimbursement rate paid to similarly situated in-network behavioral health care providers providing services to covered persons in the service area.(c) Parity required and discrimination prohibited.--A contract under subsection (a) must be in parity with and may not unfairly discriminate against behavioral health care providers generally in comparison to other health care providers, or against the specific behavioral health care provider seeking to contract, including with respect to the following:(1) Practice standards.(2) Quality requirements.(3) Credentialing criteria.(4) Reimbursement rates.(5) Network tier placement, if applicable.(d) Construction.--Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit an insurer from contracting with a behavioral health care provider that provides services through telemedicine from an office that is not located in this Commonwealth.§ 4605. Preclusion permitted.An insurer may preclude a behavioral health care provider from participation in a network if either of the following occurs:(1) The insurer demonstrates that the behavioral health care provider has materially failed to comply with the standard terms and conditions for participation.(2) The insurer is engaged in a reasonable investigation for, or has made a finding of, fraud, waste or abuse with respect to the behavioral health care provider.§ 4606. Parity and nondiscrimination.20260HB2653PN3662 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The terms "parity" and "discrimination" in this chapter shall be construed in accordance with Article VI-B of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921.§ 4607. Claim handling.Claim handling, including prompt payment for claim handling, shall be subject to the provisions of Article XXI of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921.§ 4608. Scope of practice.Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to expand the scope of practice of a health care provider or permit a health care provider to render care and services other than as permitted under the health care provider's license, certification or other regulatory authorization to practice under the laws of this Commonwealth.§ 4609. Regulations.The department may promulgate regulations as necessary and appropriate to implement, administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter.§ 4610. Violations.(a) Penalties.--Subject to subsection (b), upon satisfactory evidence of a violation of this chapter by an insurer, the commissioner may, in the commissioner's discretion, pursue any of the following courses of action:(1) Suspend, revoke or refuse to renew the license of the offending person.(2) Enter a cease and desist order.(3) Impose a civil penalty of not more than $5,000 for each action in violation of this chapter.20260HB2653PN3662 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Impose a civil penalty of not more than $10,000 for each action in willful violation of this chapter.(b) Limitation.--Penalties imposed against an insurer under this section may not exceed $500,000 in the aggregate during a single calendar year.(c) Nonexclusive remedies.--The enforcement remedies imposed under this section are in addition to any other remedies or penalties that may be imposed under any other applicable law of this Commonwealth, including:(1) Article VI-B of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921. A violation of the parity and nondiscrimination provisions of this chapter shall be deemed a violation of Article VI-B of The Insurance Company Law of 1921.(2) Article XXI of The Insurance Company Law of 1921.(3) The act of July 22, 1974 (P.L.589, No.205), known as the Unfair Insurance Practices Act. A violation of this chapter shall be deemed to be an unfair method of competition and an unfair or deceptive act or practice under the Unfair Insurance Practices Act.(4) The act of December 18, 1996 (P.L.1066, No.159), known as the Accident and Health Filing Reform Act.(d) Referral.--Upon receipt or discovery of evidence of a potential violation of this chapter subject to the jurisdiction of another regulatory or law enforcement entity, including the Department of State, the Department of Health, the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs, the Department of Human Services and the Office of Attorney General, the department may refer the matter as may be appropriate.(e) Private actions.--20260HB2653PN3662 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a behavioral health care provider from using an insurer's dispute resolution process or seeking relief in an appropriate court of general jurisdiction for an alleged failure of an insurer to contract with or make a payment in accordance with this chapter to the behavioral health care provider.(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit a private cause of action for a violation of this chapter under the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.§ 4611. Administrative procedures.(a) Procedures generally.--The administrative provisions of this chapter shall be subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies).(b) Appeals.--A party against whom penalties are assessed in an administrative action may appeal to Commonwealth Court as provided in 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).Section 2. This act shall apply as follows:(1) For health insurance policies for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to any policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) For health insurance policies for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to any policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph.20260HB2653PN3662 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2653PN3662 - 9 - 1